dicts/dsb/dsb.dic
aneksiska/W
animater/v
anusowe/w
astronomiski/W
Balaton/v
Barlinski/W
barłožydło/y
barokowy/w
bědnje/E
bělidło/y
blankopołnomóc/x
blědy/wB
bliski/W
bliž/x
błoto/y
błudny/wC
Bobow/v
bogaty/wB
bójazń/z
bruń/z
brutalnje/E
buchnuś/F
burski/W
bydlecy/w
bźezmóc/x
camembert/v
cejźidło/y
cerwjeny/wC
cerwjeń/z
chóručki/W
chóry/wB
chromy/wB
chudy/wB
chytśe/E
cirkumpolarny/w
cłowesku/C
cołn/v
cybnuś/F
cysło/y
danidań/z
dań/z
darniwy/wB
dekoraciski/W
detektiw/v
digitalis/x
dłymokotwaŕ/z
dojeca/w
doktorski/W
dopomoc/xQ
dośěgnuś/F
dozwažnje/E
drobny/wC
Dubin/v
dwójaki/W
elektropógóń/z
elokwentny/w
eritrejski/W
etnikum/v
flegmatiski/W
fleksibelny/wC
fotoalbum/v
gałuz/x
gałuzy/x
garnuś/F
gasydło/y
Glinsčański/W
glucnje/E
głuchnuś/F
głupy/wB
gniwny/wC
gnojidło/y
gobelin/v
granitowy/w
grjebadło/y
grodojski/W
gropnje/E
gropny/wC
gus/x
hipodrom/v
hydrostatiski/W
inkassopołnomóc/x
instrumentarium/v
intensiwnje/E
interpersonalny/w
inženjerski/W
Jaserń/z
jasny/wC
jědriwje/E
jědriwy/wB
jěry/wB
kaftan/v
Kałkojski/W
kałnuś/F
katar/v
katawto/y
kawč/x
kiblijowaty/w
kofein/v
kokoš/x
kombimyto/y
konkretnje/E
kontraceptiwum/v
kosmologiski/W
kórknuś/F
kradny/wC
kružydło/y
kšaceń/z
kšuśe/E
kulturelnje/E
kup/z
kusyś/H
kwazisynonym/v
lasnosćiwy/wB
lěgadło/y
lěpšy/w
ležernje/E
liceński/W
luby/wB
lukratiwny/wC
łagodnje/E
łědadło/y
Łojow/v
łoźitwaŕ/z
łuž/x
mašinotwaŕ/z
masiwnje/E
maskulinumowy/w
mauretański/W
maz/ax
měkliwy/wB
měknuś/F
měrny/wC
město/y
metarěc/x
Metuzalem/v
młody/wB
modernje/E
monotony/wB
moslim/v
mócy/x
móžnostna/w
multiplikaciske/W
naddozis/x
nadobny/wC
nagle/E
najs/x
nakłoń/z
nalipnuś/F
napołožyś/H
narěc/x
naspomnjony/w
natwaŕ/z
naźěło/y
nikotin/v
niž/x
njebójazniwy/wC
njegódnje/E
njeluštny/w
njemuzikaliski/W
njepśijazń/z
njerěš/x
njespóry/w
njewužytny/wC
njezdrjały/w
njezjawnje/E
nowy/wB
objektiwnje/E
ordinarnje/E
pacny/wC
paletow/v
pałkadło/y
pastyrski/W
paśeŕ/z
pawšalny/w
piktogram/v
pjelsń/z
pjerdnuś/F
płošadło/y
płošeń/z
podstarcyś/H
połnoc/x
połwałmjany/w
poměrnje/E
pomoc/xQ
porclin/v
póbóžny/wC
pódgjardło/y
pódpołdnjowokoreański/W
pódrěc/x
pódśisnuś/F
pódtłocyś/H
pókšajźny/wC
pónižyś/H
pórědnje/E
pósměšyś/H
pótrjebowe/w
pówózyś/H
pózdychowaś/F
prarěc/x
pražrědło/y
precizny/wC
pregnantnje/E
pronomen/v
prowizoriski/W
prozń/z
pśedpokazń/z
pśegłosyś/H
pśekup/z
pśełazyś/H
pśemacany/w
pśemóc/xQ
pśepadnuś/F
pśepołožyś/H
pśestajadło/y
pśeśěžyś/H
pśetwaŕ/z
pśewidnje/E
pśewjertnuś/F
pśewuski/CW
pśibližyś/H
pśikazń/z
pśikładnje/E
pśiłožyś/H
pśischnuś/F
pśistarcyś/H
pśitwaŕ/z
pśiwitański/W
pśizagłosyś/H
pulbjerjowe/w
pyšny/wC
pyto/y
radar/v
radikalnje/E
radosćiwy/wB
rěc/x
režiser/v
rěznuś/F
rězń/z
rozkoš/x
rozkusnuś/F
rozłocyś/H
rozprošyś/H
rozskócna/w
rozymny/wC
rukowańske/W
ryjnje/E
sadło/y
šampun/v
sćerpnuś/F
sćěžań/z
šćodriwy/wB
sebjepomoc/x
sentimentalny/wC
Serb/v
serwowóźidła/y
sery/w
skazański/W
skócyś/H
słabje/E
słaby/wB
słušny/wC
smarž/x
směr/v
smyknuś/F
snowadło/y
sodowa/w
sparizń/z
spłošny/wC
spórizń/z
sprocniwy/wB
spšawnje/E
sromarski/W
stajidło/y
starcyś/H
starosćiwy/wB
starotwaŕ/z
stary/wB
statiw/v
strěty/w
strowy/wB
stuchły/wC
šumidło/y
surowy/wB
suš/x
šwicarskonimski/W
syknuś/F
šykownje/E
syndrom/v
šyŕ/z
śišćowy/w
śopły/wC
tapto/y
tonikum/v
tšachotny/wC
tšugański/W
tśifazowa/w
tuni/B
tupy/wB
twaridło/y
tympanon/v
wěcownje/E
wěcowny/wC
wěc/x
witśejšny/w
wjelikomóc/x
wjertadło/y
wobinuś/F
wobkněžyś/HS
wobprošyś/H
wobryc/x
wobśěžny/wC
wobtwarźeńske/W
wogarnuś/F
wopalony/w
wopowadło/y
woprošyś/H
wóń/z
wótamknuś/F
wótgarnuś/H
wótmoknuś/F
wótocyś/H
wótpomoc/xQ
wótšmarnuś/F
wóttocyś/H
wóttwaŕ/z
wótźěkowańske/W
wubocyś/H
wuchaty/w
wugasnuś/F
wujšpurnje/E
wujšpurny/wC
wulicyś/H
wumjelknuś/F
wumywadło/y
wupołožyś/H
wupomoc/xQ
wurucyś/H
wušwyrnuś/F
wutłocyś/H
wutwaŕ/z
wuwabny/wC
wuznawarski/W
zaběgnuś/F
žadliwy/wB
žadławy/wB
zagórjony/w
zaknipsnuś/F
zakružyś/H
žałobnje/E
zapowjesyś/H
zapóžedny/wC
zaschnuś/F
zastajadło/y
zběrnuś/F
zbratšyś/H
zeleń/z
zelowaty/w
zgjarnuś/F
zjawny/wC
zmužnje/E
zmužyś/H
znakspinadło/y
Zulumuski/W
Zwěrin/v
zwignuś/F
źaržadło/y
źaseśtysacny/w
źiwny/wC
